Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.163

Penalty for act constituting a crime under state law—Limitation.

Except as limited by the maximum penalty authorized by law, no city, code city, or town, may establish a penalty for an act that constitutes a crime under state law that is different from the penalty prescribed for that crime by state statute.

[ 1993 c 83 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 83: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1994." [ 1993 c 83 s 11.]